Washington statutes.
RCW 19.80.045

Rules—Fees.

The department must adopt rules as necessary to administer this chapter. The rules may include but are not limited to specifying forms and setting fees for trade name registrations, amendments, searches, renewals, and copies of registration documents. Fees may not exceed the actual cost of administering this chapter.

[ 2011 c 298 s 16; 1984 c 130 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1984 c 130: See note following RCW 19.80.001.